Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-508
Streets; grading and repair, when; bridges and sewers; construction.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have the power to provide for the grading and repair of any street, avenue, or alley and the construction of bridges, culverts, and sewers. No street, avenue, or alley shall be graded unless such street, avenue, or alley shall be ordered to be done by the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the city council or village board of trustees.

Laws 1879, § 69, III, p. 211;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, III, p. 173;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, III, p. 163;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, III, p. 291;

Laws 1903, c. 20, § 1, p. 248;

R.S.1913, § 5109;

Laws 1915, c. 91, § 1, p. 231;

C.S.1922, § 4282;

C.S.1929, § 17-431;

R.S.1943, § 17-508;

Laws 1945, c. 28, § 1, p. 140;

Laws 1945, c. 29, § 1, p. 143;

Laws 1947, c. 23, § 1(1), p. 143;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 125.

Cities of the second class are given the power to provide for the grading and repair of streets and the construction of culverts and sewers. Young v. City of Scribner, 171 Neb. 544, 106 N.W.2d 864 (1960).

Requirement of two-thirds vote is limited to orders for grading of streets. Village of Maxwell v. Booth, 161 Neb. 300, 73 N.W.2d 177 (1955).

Maintenance and repair of streets is a governmental function and the cost thereof must be paid from the general fund of the city. Thomson v. City of Chadron, 145 Neb. 316, 16 N.W.2d 447 (1944).

The making, improving, and repairing of streets relates to city's corporate interests only and it is liable for failure to maintain its streets in a safe condition. Goodrich v. University Place, 80 Neb. 774, 115 N.W. 538 (1908).

Where municipality makes provisions for carrying off surface water by drains, it may not discontinue the same and leave lot owner in worse condition than before it constructed such drains. City of McCook v. McAdams, 76 Neb. 1, 106 N.W. 988 (1906), affirmed on rehearing 76 Neb. 7, 110 N.W. 1005 (1907), vacated on rehearing 76 Neb. 11, 114 N.W. 596 (1908); McAdams v. City of McCook, 71 Neb. 789, 99 N.W. 656 (1904).